Nevada, session 83, SB129.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 622.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
622.530 1. Except as otherwise provided [by specific statute
relating to the issuance of a license by endorsement,] in this section,
a person may apply to a regulatory body [shall adopt regulations
providing] for the issuance of a license by endorsement to engage in
an occupation or profession in this State . A regulatory body shall
issue a license by endorsement to engage in an occupation or
profession in this State to any applicant who:
(a) Is a natural person [who:
(a) Holds] and a resident of this State.
(b) Has held for at least 1 year a corresponding valid and
unrestricted license in good standing to engage in that occupation or
profession in the District of Columbia or any state or territory of the
United States . [;
(b) Possesses qualifications that are substantially similar to the
qualifications required for issuance of a license to engage in that
occupation or profession in this State; and
(c) Satisfies the requirements of this section and the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must not
allow the issuance of a license by endorsement to engage in an
occupation or profession in this State to a natural person unless such
a person:
(a)] If the applicant holds more than one license to engage in
the occupation or profession, all such licenses must be valid,
unrestricted and in good standing.
(c) Has satisfied the minimum educational, examination and
experience requirements for each such license to engage in the
occupation or profession issued by the District of Columbia or any
state or territory, as confirmed by the corresponding regulatory
authority.
(d) Has not been disciplined by the corresponding regulatory
authority of the District of Columbia or any state or territory in
which the applicant currently holds or has held a license to engage
in [an] the occupation or profession . [;
(b)] (e) Has not been held civilly or criminally liable in the
District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United States for
misconduct relating to [his or her] the occupation or profession . [;
(c)] (f) Has not had a license to engage in [an] the occupation or
profession suspended or revoked in the District of Columbia or any
state or territory of the United States . [;
-
*SB129*

– 3 –
(d)] (g) Has not been refused a license to engage in an
occupation or profession in the District of Columbia or any state or
territory of the United States for any reason . [;
(e)] (h) Has not voluntarily surrendered any license to engage
in the occupation or profession while under investigation by the
corresponding regulatory authority of the District of Columbia or
any state or territory of the United States.
(i) Does not have pending any disciplinary action concerning his
or her license to engage in [an] the occupation or profession in the
District of Columbia or any state or territory of the United States . [;
(f)] (j) Pays any applicable fees for the issuance of a license that
are otherwise required for a natural person to obtain a license in this
State . [;
(g)] (k) Submits to the regulatory body a complete set of his or
her fingerprints and written permission authorizing the regulatory
body to forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for its report or proof that the applicant has
previously passed a comparable criminal background check . [; and
(h)] (l) Submits to the regulatory body the statement required
by NRS 425.520.
[3.] 2. A regulatory body may [, by regulation,] require an
applicant for issuance of a license by endorsement to engage in an
occupation or profession in this State pursuant to this section to
submit with his or her application:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the regulatory body that the applicant:
(1) Has achieved a passing score on a nationally recognized,
nationally accredited or nationally certified examination or other
examination approved by the regulatory body;
(2) Has completed the requirements of an appropriate
vocational, academic or professional program of study in the
occupation or profession for which the applicant is seeking a license
by endorsement in this State; and
(3) [Has engaged in the occupation or profession for which
the applicant is seeking a license by endorsement in this State
pursuant to the applicant’s existing licensure for the period
determined by the regulatory body preceding the date of the
application; and
(4)] Possesses a sufficient degree of competency in the
occupation or profession for which he or she is seeking licensure by
endorsement in this State; and
(b) An affidavit stating that the information contained in the
application and any accompanying material is true and complete . [;
and
(c) Any other information required by the regulatory body.
-
*SB129*

– 4 –
4.] 3. Not later than 21 business days after receiving an
application for a license by endorsement to engage in an occupation
or profession pursuant to this section, the regulatory body shall
provide written notice to the applicant of any additional information
required by the regulatory body to consider the application. Unless
the regulatory body denies the application for good cause, the
regulatory body shall approve the application and issue a license by
endorsement to engage in the occupation or profession to the
applicant not later than:
(a) Sixty days after receiving the application;
(b) [If the regulatory body requires an applicant to submit
fingerprints and authorize the preparation of a report on the
applicant’s background based on the submission of the applicant’s
fingerprints, 15] Fifteen days after the regulatory body receives the
report [;] on the applicant’s background based on the submission
of the applicant’s fingerprints; or
(c) If the regulatory body requires the filing and maintenance of
a bond as a requirement for the issuance of a license, 15 days after
the filing of the bond with the regulatory body,
 whichever occurs later.
[5.] 4. A license by endorsement to engage in an occupation or
profession in this State issued pursuant to this section may be issued
at a meeting of the regulatory body or between its meetings by the
presiding member of the regulatory body and the executive head of
the regulatory body. Such an action shall be deemed to be an action
of the regulatory body.
[6.] 5. A regulatory body may deny an application for
licensure by endorsement if:
(a) An applicant willfully fails to comply with the provisions of
paragraph [(g)] (k) of subsection [2;] 1; or
(b) The report from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
indicates that the applicant has been convicted of a crime that would
be grounds for taking disciplinary action against the applicant as a
licensee and the regulatory body has not previously taken
disciplinary action against the licensee based on that conviction.
[7.] 6. The provisions of this section [are intended to
supplement other provisions of statute governing licensure by
endorsement. If any provision of statute conflicts with this section,
the other provision of statute prevails over this section to the extent
that the other provisions provide more specific requirements]
relating to [licensure] obtaining a license by endorsement [.] are an
alternative to any specific statute relating to the issuance of a
license by endorsement by a regulatory body.
7. As used in this section, “regulatory body” means:
-
*SB129*

– 5 –
(a) A board or commission which has the authority to regulate
an occupation or profession pursuant to this title; and
(b) Any officer of a board or commission which has the
authority to regulate an occupation or profession pursuant to this
title.
 The term does not include a state agency or any officer of a
state agency which has the authority to regulate an occupation or
profession pursuant to this title.
Sec. 2. 1. The provisions of any regulation adopted by a
regulatory body pursuant to NRS 622.530, as that section existed
before the effective date of this section, relating to licensure by
endorsement which conflict with the provisions of NRS 622.530, as
amended by section 1 of this act, are void and must not be given
effect to the extent of the conflict.
2. The provisions of this act do not affect any regulation
adopted by a regulatory body pursuant to any specific statute
relating to the issuance of a license by endorsement other than
NRS 622.530.
3. As used in this section, “regulatory body” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 622.530, as amended by section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. This section and section 2 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purposes of adopting
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB129*